Utah statutes.
38-12-101.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Lien" means:

(a)  failure to pay money owed for property, services, or a notice of interest, a judgment, or any other encumbrance on the title, that becomes a charge against or interest in:

(i)  real property, a building, a structure, or an improvement including any franchise, privilege, appurtenance, machinery, or fixture pertaining to or used in connection with any real property, building, structure, or improvement;

(ii)  personal property; or

(iii)  a judgment, settlement, or compromise; or

(b)  a tax as provided in Section 59-1-1413, 59-5-108, 59-5-208, 59-11-110, or 59-12-112.

(2)  "Lien" does not mean a charge against or interest in, for failure to pay money owed for property, services, or a judgment, any:

(a)  bank account;

(b)  pension; or

(c)  garnishment.

